Nevada, session 83, SB202.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 205.0813 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
205.0813 1. A person who forcibly enters an uninhabited or
vacant dwelling, who knows or has reason to believe that such entry
is without permission of the owner of the dwelling or an authorized
representative of the owner or who intentionally procures or offers
a false or forged written rental agreement, and who has the intent
to take up residence or provide a residency to another therein is
guilty of housebreaking.
2. A person is presumed to know that an entry described in
subsection 1 is without the permission of the owner of the dwelling
or an authorized representative of the owner unless the person
provides a written rental agreement that:
(a) Is notarized or is signed by an authorized agent of the owner
who at the time of signing holds a permit to engage in property
management pursuant to chapter 645 of NRS; and
(b) Includes the current address and telephone number of the
owner or his or her authorized representative.
3. A person convicted of housebreaking is guilty of:
(a) For a first offense, a gross misdemeanor; and
(b) For a second and any subsequent offense, a category D
felony and shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
4. A person convicted of housebreaking and who has
previously been convicted three or more times of housebreaking
-
*SB202_R1*

– 3 –
must not be released on probation or granted a suspension of
sentence.
5. As used in this section, “forcibly enters” means an entry
involving:
(a) Any act of physical force resulting in damage to the
structure; or
(b) The changing or manipulation of a lock to gain access.
Sec. 2. NRS 205.0817 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.0817 1. A person who takes up residence in [an
uninhabited or vacant] a dwelling and who knows or has reason to
believe that such residency is without permission of the owner of the
dwelling or an authorized representative of the owner or who
intentionally procures or offers a false or forged written rental
agreement is guilty of unlawful occupancy.
2. A person is presumed to know that the residency described
in subsection 1 is without the permission of the owner of the
dwelling or an authorized representative of the owner unless the
person provides a written rental agreement that:
(a) Is notarized or is signed by an authorized agent of the owner
who at the time of signing holds a permit to engage in property
management pursuant to chapter 645 of NRS; and
(b) Includes the current address and telephone number of the
owner or his or her authorized representative.
3. A person convicted of unlawful occupancy is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor. A person convicted of unlawful occupancy and
who has been convicted three or more times of unlawful occupancy
is guilty of a category D felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
4. A person who is accused of unlawful occupancy pursuant to
subsection 1 and has previously been convicted two times of
housebreaking, unlawful occupancy or any lesser included or related
offense, or any combination thereof, arising from the same set of
facts is presumed to have obtained residency of the dwelling with
the knowledge that:
(a) Any asserted lease is invalid; and
(b) Neither the owner nor an authorized representative of the
owner permitted the residency.
Sec. 2.3. NRS 40.215 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.215 As used in NRS 40.215 to 40.425, inclusive, unless the
context requires otherwise:
1. “Dwelling” or “dwelling unit” means a structure or part
thereof that is occupied, or designed or intended for occupancy, as a
residence or sleeping place by one person who maintains a
household or by two or more persons who maintain a common
household.
-
*SB202_R1*

– 4 –
2. “Landlord’s agent” means a person who is hired or
authorized by the landlord or owner of real property to manage the
property or dwelling unit, to enter into a rental agreement on behalf
of the landlord or owner of the property or who serves as a person
within this State who is authorized to act for and on behalf of the
landlord or owner for the purposes of service of process or receiving
notices and demands. A landlord’s agent may also include a
successor landlord or a property manager as defined in
NRS 645.0195.
3. “Mobile home” means every vehicle, including equipment,
which is constructed, reconstructed or added to in such a way as to
have an enclosed room or addition occupied by one or more persons
as a residence or sleeping place and which has no foundation other
than wheels, jacks, skirting or other temporary support.
4. “Mobile home lot” means a portion of land within a mobile
home park which is rented or held out for rent to accommodate a
mobile home.
5. “Mobile home park” or “park” means an area or tract of land
where two or more mobile homes or mobile home lots are rented or
held out for rent. “Mobile home park” or “park” does not include
those areas or tracts of land, whether within or outside of a park,
where the lots are held out for rent on a nightly basis.
6. “Premises” includes a mobile home.
7. “Recreational vehicle” means a vehicular structure primarily
designed as temporary living quarters for travel, recreational or
camping use, which may be self-propelled or mounted upon or
drawn by a motor vehicle.
8. “Recreational vehicle lot” means a portion of land within a
recreational vehicle park, or a portion of land so designated within a
mobile home park, which is rented or held out for rent to
accommodate a recreational vehicle overnight or for less than 3
months.
9. “Recreational vehicle park” means an area or tract of land
where lots are rented or held out for rent to accommodate a
recreational vehicle overnight or for less than 3 months.
10. “Short-term tenancy” means a tenancy in which rent is
reserved by a period of 1 week and the tenancy has not continued
for more than 45 days.
11. “Squatter” means a person who violates the provisions of
NRS 205.0813 or 205.0817. Notwithstanding any other provision
of law, the term includes, without limitation, a person who enters
onto or intrudes upon real property without the permission of the
owner and continues to occupy the property without title, right or
permission of the owner or an authorized representative of the
owner.
-
*SB202_R1*

– 5 –
12. “Tenant” means an occupant of real property, a dwelling
or dwelling unit or a recreational vehicle or mobile home. The
term does not include a squatter.
Sec. 2.5. NRS 40.412 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.412 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, in
addition to the remedy provided in NRS 40.290 to 40.420, inclusive,
when all known unlawful or unauthorized adult occupants of a
dwelling have been arrested for housebreaking or unlawful
occupancy and all minor occupants are taken into the custody of the
State, the owner of the dwelling may retake possession and change
the locks on the dwelling.
2. At the time an owner of a dwelling retakes possession or
changes the locks of a dwelling pursuant to subsection 1, the owner
or an authorized representative of the owner shall post a written
notice on the dwelling. The notice must:
(a) Identify the address of the dwelling;
(b) Identify the court that has jurisdiction over any matter
relating to the dwelling;
(c) Identify the date on which the owner took possession of the
dwelling pursuant to subsection 1 or changed the locks; and
(d) Advise the unlawful or unauthorized occupant that:
(1) One or more locks on the dwelling have been changed as
the result of an arrest for housebreaking or unlawful occupancy.
(2) The unlawful or unauthorized occupant has the right to
contest the matter by filing a verified complaint for reentry with the
court pursuant to NRS 40.416 within [21] 5 calendar days after the
date indicated in paragraph (c). The complaint must be served upon
the owner of the dwelling or the authorized representative of the
owner at the address provided to the court with the filing of the
written notice pursuant to subsection 3.
(3) Reentry of the property without a court order is a criminal
offense [,] punishable [by up to 4 years in prison.] pursuant to
NRS 205.082.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, the
owner of the dwelling shall provide safe storage of any personal
property which remains on the property. The owner may dispose of
any personal property which remains on the property after [21] 5
calendar days from the date indicated in paragraph (c) unless within
that time the owner receives an affidavit or notice of hearing
pursuant to NRS [40.414.] 40.416. The unlawful or unauthorized
occupant may recover his or her personal property by filing an
affidavit with the court pursuant to NRS [40.414] 40.416 within [21]
5 calendar days after the date indicated in paragraph (c). The owner
is entitled to payment of the reasonable and actual costs of
-
*SB202_R1*

– 6 –
inventory, moving and storage before releasing the personal
property to the occupant.
3. The notice posted pursuant to subsection 2 must remain
posted on the dwelling for not less than [21] 5 calendar days. A
copy of the notice must be filed with the court not later than 1 day
after any locks are changed on the dwelling and must be
accompanied by a statement which includes an address for service
of any documents on the owner of the dwelling or an authorized
representative of the owner.
4. This section does not apply if one or more unlawful or
unauthorized occupants is occupying the dwelling.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Housebreaking” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS
205.0813.
(b) “Unlawful occupancy” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 205.0817.
Sec. 2.7. NRS 40.416 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.416 1. If the owner of a dwelling or an authorized
representative of the owner locks an occupant out of the dwelling
pursuant to NRS 40.412, the occupant may recover possession of
the dwelling and the personal property of the occupant as provided
in this section.
2. The occupant must file with the justice court of the township
in which the dwelling is located a verified complaint for reentry,
specifying:
(a) The facts of the lockout by the owner of the dwelling or the
authorized representative of the owner; and
(b) The legal basis upon which reentry into the dwelling is
warranted.
3. The court shall, after notice to both parties, hold a trial on
the occupant’s verified complaint for reentry not later than 10
judicial days after the date on which the occupant files the verified
complaint for reentry.
4. If the court finds that an unjustified lockout has occurred,
the court must issue a writ of restitution, restoring possession of the
dwelling and any personal property to the occupant.
5. A party may appeal from the court’s judgment at the trial on
the verified complaint for reentry in the same manner as a party may
appeal a judgment in an action for forcible detainer.
6. If the owner of the dwelling or the person on whom a writ of
restitution is served fails to immediately comply with the writ or
later disobeys the writ, the failure is grounds for contempt of court
against the owner or the person on whom the writ was served, under
chapter 22 of NRS.
7. This section does not affect:
-
*SB202_R1*

– 7 –
(a) The right of any party to pursue a separate cause of action
under this chapter or chapter 118A of NRS if the court finds that a
landlord and tenant relationship exists between the parties; or
(b) The rights of an owner or occupant in a forcible detainer,
unlawful detainer or forcible entry and detainer action.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB202_R1*